Utah statutes.
53B-15-105.   Filing of abstract of order of default -- Lien -- Deduction from wages.

An abstract of an order of a hearing examiner stating a default may be filed with the financial officer responsible for payment of the public employee's wages.  When filed, the abstract constitutes a lien against 15% of the disposable earnings due, or to become due, to the public employee to the extent of the balance due plus interest.  The financial officer shall deduct the amount subject to this lien from the public employee's disposable earnings, and remit the deducted amount to the college, university, or board, but no such amount shall be remitted to the college, university, or board until 20 days after the date of the hearing examiner's order.

